Hawaii statutes.
[§342F-2] Administration. The
department shall administer this chapter through the director. The director
may delegate to any person such power and authority vested in the director by
this chapter as the director deems reasonable and proper for the effective
administration of this chapter, except the power to make rules. [L 1989, c 212,
pt of §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next